Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1581.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7303(b), (c), (d) and (e) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 7303. Sale or illegal use of certain solvents and noxious substances.* * *(b) Exception.--Subsection (a) [of this section] shall not apply to the inhalation of any anesthesia for medical or dental purposes.(c) Possession prohibited.--No person shall, for the purpose of violating subsection (a) [of this section], use, or possess for the purpose of so using, any noxious substance or substance containing a solvent having the property of releasing toxic 12345678910111213141516171819 vapors or fumes.(d) Sale prohibited.--No person shall sell at retail, or offer to sell, to any other person any tube or other container of any noxious substance or substance containing a solvent having the property of releasing toxic vapors or fumes, if he has reasonable cause to suspect that the product sold, or offered for sale, will be used for the purpose set forth in subsection (a) [of this section].(d.1) Sale prohibited to minors.--No person shall sell at retail, or offer to sell, to a minor any tube or other container of any noxious substance or substance containing a solvent having the property of releasing toxic vapors or fumes, if he has reasonable cause to suspect that the product sold, or offered for sale, will be used by a minor for the purpose set forth in subsection (a).(e) Grading.--(1) Any person who violates subsection (d.1) commits a misdemeanor of the second degree.(2) Any person who violates any other provision of this section [shall be guilty of] commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1581PN1891 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223